Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.020

Action by parent for seduction of child.

A father or mother, may maintain an action as plaintiff for the seduction of a child, and the guardian for the seduction of a ward, though the child or the ward be not living with or in the service of the plaintiff at the time of the seduction or afterwards, and there be no loss of service.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 5; Code 1881 s 10; 1877 p 5 s 10; 1869 p 4 s 10; RRS s 185.]

NOTES:

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 154: See note following RCW 2.12.030.